Maryland, session 2025, HB0084.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
SUBTITLE 9. MAJOR HIGHWAY CAPACITY EXPANSION PROJECTS.
2–901.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “CARBON DIOXIDE EQUIVALENT” MEANS THE MEASUREMENT OF A
GIVEN WEIGHT OF A GREENHOUSE GAS THAT HAS THE SAME GLOBAL WARMING
POTENTIAL, MEASURED OVER A SPECIFIED PERIOD OF TIME, AS 1 METRIC TON OF
CARBON DIOXIDE.
(C) “GREENHOUSE GAS” INCLUDES CARBON DIOXIDE, METHANE, NITROUS
OXIDE, HYDROFLUOROCARBONS, PERFLUOROCARBONS, AND SULFUR
HEXAFLUORIDE.
(D) “GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS” MEANS EMISSIONS OF GREENHOUSE
GASES IN THE STATE, MEASURED IN METRIC TONS OF CARBON DIOXIDE
EQUIVALENTS.
(E) “IMPACT ASSESSMENT” MEANS AN ASSESSMENT OF A PROJECT’S OR
PROGRAM’S OPERATIONAL IMPACT ON GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS AND VEHICLE
MILES TRAVELED.
(F) “INDUCED DEMAND” MEANS THE VOLUME OF TRAFFIC THAT IS DRAWN
TO A NEW OR EXPANDED ROAD BY PROVIDING ADDITIONAL CAPACITY, INCLUDING
FROM:
(1) TRIPS DIVERTED FROM OTHER ROUTES;
(2) DISCRETIONARY TRIPS THAT MAY NOT HAVE BEEN MADE
WITHOUT IMPROVEMENT; AND

HOUSE BILL 84 3
(3) IMPROVED ACCESS TO EMPLOYMENT AND OTHER ACTIVITY
LOCATION CHOICES AN INCREASE IN THE DEMAND FOR MOTOR VEHICLE TRAVEL
THAT IS DEMONSTRATED BY AN INCREASE IN VEHICLE MILES TRAVELED DUE TO AN
INCREASE IN ROADWAY SUPPLY, SUCH AS NEW OR EXPANDED ROADS, ADDITIONAL
CAPACITY, OR ADDITIONAL LANE MILES.
(G) “MAJOR CAPITAL PROJECT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 2–103.1 OF
THIS TITLE.
(H) “MAJOR HIGHWAY CAPACITY EXPANSION PROJECT” MEANS A MAJOR
CAPITAL PROJECT THAT:
(1) THROUGH ALL PHASES INCREASES HIGHWAY CAPACITY
THROUGH NEW HIGHWAY LANES, GRADE SEPARATIONS INCLUDING INTERCHANGES,
OR EXTENDED HIGHWAY LANES; AND
(2) HAS A TOTAL COST FOR ALL PHASES THAT EXCEEDS $5,000,000
$100,000,000.
(I) “OVERBURDENED COMMUNITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 1–701
OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
(J) “SYSTEM PRESERVATION ACTIVITY” MEANS AN ACTIVITY FOCUSED ON
MAINTAINING AND REHABILITATING EXISTING TRANSPORTATION
INFRASTRUCTURE TO ENSURE THE INFRASTRUCTURE REMAINS SAFE, RELIABLE,
AND FUNCTIONAL.
(J) (K) “UNDERSERVED COMMUNITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
1–701 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
(K) (L) “VEHICLE MILES TRAVELED PER CAPITA” MEANS THE TOTAL
NUMBER OF ON–ROAD MILES TRAVELED BY VEHICLES IN A GEOGRAPHIC REGION
OVER A 1–YEAR PERIOD DIVIDED BY THE POPULATION IN THAT REGION.
2–902.
THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT APPLY TO A MAJOR HIGHWAY CAPACITY EXPANSION
PROJECT THAT ON OR BEFORE JUNE 30, 2025, WAS:
(1) A WAS A PART OF THE STATEWIDE TRANSPORTATION
IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM THAT RECEIVED FUNDING FOR CONSTRUCTION; OR

HOUSE BILL 84
(2) FUNDED WAS FUNDED FOR CONSTRUCTION IN THE
CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM; OR
(3) COMPLETED THE ENVIRONMENTAL REVIEW PROCESS UNDER THE
NATIONAL ENVIRONMENTAL POLICY ACT.
2–903.
(A) AS PART OF THE PLANNING AND IMPLEMENTATION OF A MAJOR
HIGHWAY CAPACITY EXPANSION PROJECT, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PERFORM AN
IMPACT ASSESSMENT OF THE PROJECT AND DEVELOP AND IMPLEMENT A
CORRESPONDING MULTIMODAL TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM FOR THE PROPOSED
HIGHWAY CORRIDOR EXPANSION.
(B) (1) DURING PROJECT DEVELOPMENT OF THE MAJOR HIGHWAY
CAPACITY EXPANSION PROJECT, THE MULTIMODAL TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM
REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL IDENTIFY
INVESTMENTS IN TRANSIT, TRANSIT–ORIENTED DEVELOPMENT, TRANSPORTATION
DEMAND MANAGEMENT, PEDESTRIAN AND BICYCLE FACILITIES, LAND USE
CHANGES, AND OTHER MEASURES ACTIVITIES SPECIFIED IN § 2–904(C) OF THIS
SUBTITLE TO OFFSET THE INCREASE IN VEHICLE MILES TRAVELED GREENHOUSE
GAS EMISSIONS ASSOCIATED WITH THE PROJECT.
(2) THE MULTIMODAL TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM SHALL FOCUS ON
AREAS IN THE FOLLOWING ORDER OF PRIORITY:
(I) OVERBURDENED COMMUNITIES AND UNDERSERVED
COMMUNITIES IMPACTED BY THE MAJOR HIGHWAY CAPACITY EXPANSION PROJECT;
(II) AREAS WITHIN OR ASSOCIATED WITH AT LEAST ONE OF THE
COMMUNITIES IMPACTED BY THE PROJECT;
(III) OVERBURDENED COMMUNITIES AND UNDERSERVED
COMMUNITIES ACROSS THE STATE;
(IV) OVERBURDENED COMMUNITIES AND UNDERSERVED
COMMUNITIES IN THE THE REGION IN WHICH THE MAJOR HIGHWAY CAPACITY
EXPANSION PROJECT IS LOCATED; AND
(V) BENEFITS TO THE ENTIRE STATE THE STATE AT LARGE.
(C) (1) THE MULTIMODAL TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM SHALL OFFSET
THE VEHICLE MILES TRAVELED GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS ASSOCIATED WITH
THE MAJOR HIGHWAY CAPACITY EXPANSION PROJECT.

HOUSE BILL 84 5
(2) THE NET VEHICLE MILES TRAVELED GREENHOUSE GAS
EMISSIONS FROM THE PROJECT AND ITS ASSOCIATED MULTIMODAL
TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM SHALL EQUAL ZERO OR A NUMBER LESS THAN ZERO BE
ZERO OR A NEGATIVE NUMBER.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONSIDER BOTH THE MAJOR HIGHWAY
CAPACITY EXPANSION PROJECT AND THE MULTIMODAL TRANSPORTATION OFFSET
PROGRAM AS PART OF ITS EVALUATION OF THE PROJECT UNDER § 2–103.7 OF THIS
TITLE.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL FUND:
(1) FUND ELEMENTS OF THE MULTIMODAL TRANSPORTATION
PROGRAM CONCURRENTLY WITH FUNDING FOR THE CONSTRUCTION OF THE MAJOR
HIGHWAY CAPACITY EXPANSION PROJECT; OR
(2) DEFER THE MAJOR HIGHWAY EXPANSION CAPACITY PROJECT
UNTIL THE PROJECT MEETS THE OFFSETTING REQUIREMENTS FOR A MULTIMODAL
TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
2–904.
(A) (1) BEGINNING WITH THE CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION
PROGRAM FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 THROUGH FISCAL YEAR 2032 AND IN EACH
ANNUAL RELEASE THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL EVALUATE MAJOR
CAPITAL PROJECTS INCLUDED IN THE CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION
PROGRAM FOR THEIR IMPACT ON:
(I) GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS; AND
(II) VEHICLE MILES TRAVELED PER CAPITA.
(2) IF THE NET IMPACT OF A MAJOR CAPITAL PROJECT IS AN
INCREASE IN GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS, THE STATE SHALL FUND OFFSETTING
ACTIVITIES TO REDUCE THE NET GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS TO ZERO OR A
NUMBER LESS THAN ZERO.
(3) THE EVALUATION REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE PUBLISHED FOR THE DRAFT CONSOLIDATED
TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM BY OCTOBER 1 EACH YEAR, AND WITH THE FINAL
CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM EACH YEAR.

HOUSE BILL 84
(B) (1) BEGINNING WITH THE CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION
PROGRAM FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 THROUGH FISCAL YEAR 2032 AND IN EACH
ANNUAL RELEASE THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ACHIEVE, TO THE
MAXIMUM EXTENT PRACTICABLE AND SUBJECT TO THE STATE BUDGET
APPROPRIATIONS, A PROGRAM WHOSE IMPACT ON GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS IS
CONSISTENT WITH, AND MAKES AND PROGRESS TOWARD ACHIEVING GREENHOUSE
GAS REDUCTION TARGETS ARE, OVER THE CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION
PROGRAM PERIOD, CONSISTENT WITH THE STATE’S CARBON POLLUTION
REDUCTION PLAN OVER THE CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM PERIOD
THE PROJECTED GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSION REDUCTIONS MODELED FOR ROADS
IN MARYLAND’S CLIMATE POLLUTION REDUCTION PLAN: MODELING APPENDIX.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT MAY SHALL FUND OFFSETTING ACTIVITIES TO
MAKE THE CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM MORE CONSISTENT WITH
THE GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSION REDUCTION GOALS UNDER THE STATE’S CARBON
POLLUTION REDUCTION PLAN OR TO INCREASE PROGRESS TOWARD THOSE GOALS
DEPARTMENT’S 2023 CLIMATE POLLUTION REDUCTION PLAN AND THE TARGETS
ESTABLISHED IN SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION.
(C) THE OFFSETTING ACTIVITIES REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTIONS (A) AND
(B) OF THIS SECTION ARE ACTIVITIES THAT:
(1) DEMONSTRABLY CREATE CONSISTENT, LONG–TERM REDUCTIONS
IN GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS OR VEHICLE MILES TRAVELED;
(2) PRIORITIZE OVERBURDENED AND UNDERSERVED COMMUNITIES;
(3) ARE ELIGIBLE FOR FUNDING UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OR (B) OF
THIS SECTION; AND
(3) (4) INCLUDE:
(I) PARKING REDUCTION INITIATIVES;
(II) ACTIVE TRANSPORTATION;
(III) TRANSPORTATION TRANSIT–ORIENTED DEVELOPMENT
AND TRANSPORTATION DEMAND MANAGEMENT STRATEGIES;
(IV) LOW–TRAVEL–DEMAND COMMERCIAL AND RESIDENTIAL
DEVELOPMENT AND OTHER LAND USE CHANGES;
(V) ROADWAY PRICING;

HOUSE BILL 84 7
(VI) TELECOMMUTING;
(VII) PUBLIC TRANSIT SERVICE IMPROVEMENTS AND
EXPANSION;
(VIII) MICRO–MOBILITY, INCLUDING THROUGH THE USE OF
ADAPTIVE AND INCLUSIVE LOW–SPEED VEHICLES FOR PEOPLE WITH DISABILITIES;
(IX) ACCESSIBLE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENTS THAT
COMPLY WITH THE AMERICANS WITH DISABILITIES ACT AND PEDESTRIAN
IMPROVEMENTS FOR PEOPLE WITH DISABILITIES;
(X) ALTERNATIVE ENERGY GENERATION SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATION ON PROPERTY CONTROLLED BY THE DEPARTMENT; AND
(XI) OTHER ACTIVITIES IDENTIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT OR
THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION TO REDUCE TRANSPORTATION
EMISSIONS TO REDUCE VEHICLE MILES TRAVELED.
(D) TO ACHIEVE THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER THIS SECTION, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL SET ANNUAL:
(1) ANNUAL STATEWIDE DECLINING GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSION
REDUCTION TARGETS THAT INCORPORATE ASSUMPTIONS ABOUT THE USE OF
ELECTRIC VEHICLES IN THE STATE; AND
(2) ANNUAL REGIONAL DECLINING GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSION
REDUCTION TARGETS THAT:
(I) ARE SET AT AN AMOUNT THAT WHEN MET AND TAKEN
COLLECTIVELY FOR ALL REGIONS WOULD ACHIEVE THE REQUIREMENTS SPECIFIED
IN § 2–903(C)(2) OF THIS SUBTITLE AND THE STATEWIDE TARGETS SET UNDER ITEM
(1) OF THIS ITEM; AND
(II) INCORPORATE ASSUMPTIONS ABOUT THE USE OF ELECTRIC
VEHICLES IN THE STATE.
(E) IN EVALUATING THE CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM’S
IMPACT ON GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS AND VEHICLE MILES TRAVELED, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) ESTABLISH THE BASELINE TOTAL GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS
ATTRIBUTABLE TO SURFACE TRANSPORTATION IN THE STATE FOR THE
CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM PERIOD;

HOUSE BILL 84
(2) CONSIDER THE DIRECT AND INDUCED DEMAND IMPACTS OF
HIGHWAY CAPACITY EXPANSION PROJECTS AND TRANSIT MAJOR CAPITAL
PROJECTS ON VEHICLE MILES TRAVELED PER CAPITA AND GREENHOUSE GAS
EMISSIONS;
(3) CONSIDER THE DIRECT CLIMATE BENEFITS OF INVESTMENTS IN:
(I) TRANSIT OPERATIONS, INCLUDING LOCALLY OPERATED
TRANSIT SYSTEMS;
(II) TRANSIT–ORIENTED DEVELOPMENT AND
TRANSPORTATION DEMAND MANAGEMENT, INCLUDING LAND DEVELOPMENT
DESIGNED TO REDUCED TRAVEL DEMAND;
(III) PEDESTRIAN AND BICYCLE INFRASTRUCTURE;
(IV) ELECTRIFICATION OF STATE VEHICLES;
(V) VEHICLE CHARGING INFRASTRUCTURE; AND
(VI) ALTERNATIVE ENERGY GENERATION SOLAR ENERGY
GENERATION ON PROPERTY CONTROLLED BY THE DEPARTMENT; AND
(4) COMPARE THE PROJECTED GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS TO THE
TARGET EMISSIONS ESTABLISHED IN SUBSECTION (C) (D) OF THIS SECTION TO
DETERMINE WHETHER THE CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM
ACHIEVES THE EMISSIONS TARGETS.
(F) IN EVALUATING WHETHER THE CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION
PROGRAM MEETS GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSION GOALS, THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT
CONSIDER STATE OF GOOD REPAIR ACTIVITIES AND ACTIVITIES THAT ARE SOLELY
FOR SYSTEM PRESERVATION ACTIVITIES.
2–905.
(A) THE SECRETARY SHALL:
(1) ESTABLISH A PROCESS TO PERFORM CAPACITY EXPANSION
IMPACT ASSESSMENTS;
(2) ESTABLISH A PROCESS FOR CONSIDERING PROGRESS MADE
TOWARD MEETING THE TARGETS SPECIFIED IN § 2–904(D) OF THIS SUBTITLE;

HOUSE BILL 84 9
(3) ESTABLISH A PROCESS FOR DEVELOPING A MULTIMODAL
TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM UNDER § 2–903 OF THIS SUBTITLE, INCLUDING A
METHOD FOR CONSIDERING THE DIRECT AND INDUCED DEMAND IMPACTS OF A
MAJOR HIGHWAY CAPACITY EXPANSION PROJECT; AND
(4) PUBLISH ON THE DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE:
(I) THE PROCESSES ESTABLISHED UNDER ITEMS (2) AND (3) OF
THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(II) ANY MULTIMODAL TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM
DEVELOPED UNDER § 2–903 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) REQUIRE THE USE OF AN IMPACT ASSESSMENT IN THE
DETERMINATIONS REQUIRED UNDER §§ 2–903 AND 2–904 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(3) IMPLEMENT THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER THIS SECTION,
INCLUDING BY ESTABLISHING:
(I) ANY NECESSARY POLICIES, PROCEDURES, MANUALS, AND
TECHNICAL SPECIFICATIONS;
(II) PROCEDURES TO PERFORM AN IMPACT ASSESSMENT THAT
PROVIDES FOR THE DETERMINATIONS REQUIRED UNDER §§ 2–902 AND 2–903 OF
THIS SUBTITLE;
(III) CRITERIA FOR IDENTIFICATION OF A CAPACITY EXPANSION
PROJECT; AND
(IV) RELATED DATA REPORTING FROM LOCAL UNITS OF
GOVERNMENT ON LOCAL MULTIMODAL TRANSPORTATION SYSTEMS AND LOCAL
PROJECT IMPACTS ON GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS AND VEHICLE MILES
TRAVELED.
(B) AN ANALYSIS UNDER A CAPACITY EXPANSION IMPACT ASSESSMENT
SHALL INCLUDE ESTIMATES RESULTING FROM A PROJECT OR PORTFOLIO OF
PROJECTS FOR THE FOLLOWING:
(1) GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS OVER A PERIOD OF 20 YEARS;
(2) A NET CHANGE IN VEHICLE MILES TRAVELED FOR THE AFFECTED
NETWORK; AND

HOUSE BILL 84
(3) IMPACTS TO STATE HIGHWAYS AND RELATED IMPACTS TO LOCAL
ROAD SYSTEMS, ON A LOCAL, REGIONAL, OR STATEWIDE BASIS AS APPROPRIATE.
(C) THE ANALYSIS AND ESTIMATES SPECIFIED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF
THIS SECTION SHALL BE DETERMINED USING THE BEST AVAILABLE DATA AND
MODELING TOOLS, SUCH AS:
(1) THE NATIONAL CENTER FOR SUSTAINABLE TRANSPORTATION’S
INDUCED TRAVEL CALCULATOR;
(2) THE STATE HIGHWAY INDUCED FREQUENCY OF TRAVEL
CALCULATOR;
(3) THE CAMBRIDGE SYSTEMATICS TRANSPORTATION EFFICIENCY
AND CARBON REDUCTION TOOL; OR
(4) ANY OTHER IMPACT ASSESSMENT TOOL USED FOR MEASURING
INDUCED DEMAND FOR GRADE SEPARATION PROJECTS.
(D) (B) IN FISCAL YEAR 2025 2026, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ALLOCATE
FUNDING FOR THE IMPLEMENTATION AND DEVELOPMENT OF STATEWIDE AND
REGIONAL TRAVEL DEMAND MODELING RELATED TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS
SECTION, INCLUDING INDUCED DEMAND AND LAND USE EFFECTS FROM
TRANSPORTATION INVESTMENTS.
8–102.
(a) It is the policy of this title to promote an efficient and economical
transportation system.
(b) The Department [of Transportation] and the [State Highway] Administration
may not proceed to the final project planning phase unless it has been determined that the
objective of the proposed project cannot be reasonably achieved through:
(1) Improvements in highway maintenance and safety;
(2) Projects that modify existing highways but provide for minimal
relocation or new highway construction; and
(3) Improvements in, or adoption of, transit alternatives, including mass
transit alternatives.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT AND THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ISSUE A REPORT
PRIOR TO PROCEEDING TO THE FINAL PROJECT PLANNING PHASE THAT
DOCUMENTS:

HOUSE BILL 84 11
(1) THE EVALUATION OF THE ALTERNATIVES IDENTIFIED IN
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION; OR
(2) A DETERMINATION THROUGH OTHER REQUIRED PLANNING
DOCUMENTS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.